Utah statutes.
78A-6-1205.   Dispositions.

(1)  Youth court dispositional options include:

(a)  compensatory service;

(b)  participation in law-related educational classes, appropriate counseling, treatment, or other educational programs;

(c)  providing periodic reports to the youth court;

(d)  participating in mentoring programs;

(e)  participation by the youth as a member of a youth court;

(f)  letters of apology;

(g)  essays; and

(h)  any other disposition considered appropriate by the youth court and adult coordinator.

(2)  Youth courts may not impose a term of imprisonment or detention and may not impose fines.

(3)  Youth court dispositions shall be completed within 180 days from the date of referral.

(4)  Youth court dispositions shall be reduced to writing and signed by the youth and a parent, guardian, or legal custodian indicating their acceptance of the disposition terms.

(5)  Youth court shall notify the referring source if a participant fails to successfully complete the youth court disposition.  The referring source may then take any action it considers appropriate.



Amended by Chapter 356, 2009 General Session

